Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-2416
Sewerage project, defined.

Sewerage project shall mean any plant, works, system, facilities, and real and personal property of any nature whatsoever, together with all parts and appurtenances thereto, or any interest therein or right to capacity thereof, used or useful in the removal, discharge, conduction, collection, carrying, treatment, recycling, purification, or disposal of gaseous, liquid, or solid sewage and wastes.

Laws 1981, LB 132, § 16.